Utah statutes.
32A-1-104.   Policy.
The policies of the state are:
(1)  The administration of this title shall be nonpartisan and free of
partisan political influence.
(2)  Alcoholic beverage control shall be operated as a public business using
sound management principles and practices.  The business shall be governed by
a commission and operated by a department.  The business shall function with
the intent of servicing the public demand for alcoholic beverages.
(3)  The commission and department may not promote or encourage the sale or
consumption of alcoholic beverages.
(4)  The commission shall conduct, license, and regulate the sale of alcoholic
beverages in a manner and at prices that:
(a)  reasonably satisfy the public demand and protect the public interest,
including the rights of citizens who do not wish to be involved with alcoholic
products; and
(b)  will promote the reduction of the harmful effects of over consumption of
alcoholic beverages by adults and consumption of alcoholic beverages by
minors.
